nursery/apertium-eng-afr/apertium-eng-afr.afr.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>·ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzáéíóúýÁÉÍÓÚÝ</alphabet>

  <!-- Symbol definitions -->

  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"       c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="m"       c="Masculine"/>
    <sdef n="f"       c="Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="nt"      c="Neuter"/>
    <sdef n="mf"      c="Masculine-Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="sg"      c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="pl"      c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="prn"     c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="pr"      c="Preposition"/>

    <sdef n="cnjcoo"  c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"  c="Subordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"  c="Adverbial conjunction"/>

    <sdef n="vbser"   c="The verb 'to be'"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"   c="Lexical verb"/>	
    <sdef n="vaux"    c="Auxilliary verb"/>	
    <sdef n="vbhaver" c="The verb 'to have'"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"   c="Modal verb"/>
    <sdef n="pri"     c="Present indicative"/>
    <sdef n="past"    c="Past tense"/>
    <sdef n="pres"    c="Present tense"/>
    <sdef n="inf"     c="Infinitive"/>

    <sdef n="aff"     c="Affirmative"/>
    <sdef n="int"     c="Interrogative"/>
    <sdef n="neg"     c="Negative"/>

    <sdef n="p1"      c="First person"/>
    <sdef n="p2"      c="Second person"/>
    <sdef n="p3"      c="Third person"/>
    <sdef n="impers"  c="Impersonal"/>
 
    <sdef n="tn"      c="Tonico"/>
    <sdef n="adj"     c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="sint"    c="Synthetic adjective"/>
    <sdef n="comp"    c="Comparative"/>
    <sdef n="sup"     c="Superlative"/>
    <sdef n="attr"    c="Attributive"/>
    <sdef n="pred"    c="Predicative"/>

    <sdef n="detnt"   c="Neuter determiner"/>
    <sdef n="predet"  c="Pre determiner"/>
    <sdef n="atn"/>
    <sdef n="qnt"/>
    <sdef n="ord"     c="Ordinal"/>
    <sdef n="obj"     c="Object"/>
    <sdef n="subj"    c="Subject"/>
    <sdef n="pro"     c="Proclitic"/>
    <sdef n="acr"     c="Acronym"/>
    <sdef n="ant"     c="Antroponym"/>
    <sdef n="cog"     c="Cognomen"/>
    <sdef n="al"      c="Other / Otros"/>
    <sdef n="np"      c="Proper noun"/>
    <sdef n="adv"     c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="preadv"  c="Pre-adverb"/>
    <sdef n="rel"     c="Relative"/>
    <sdef n="nn"      c="Noun noun"/>
    <sdef n="an"      c="Adjective noun"/>
    <sdef n="aa"      c="Adjective adjective"/>
    <sdef n="ind"     c="Indefinite"/>    
    <sdef n="itg"     c="Interrogative"/>
    <sdef n="det"     c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="dem"     c="Demonstrative"/>
    <sdef n="def"     c="Definite"/>
    <sdef n="ger"     c="Gerund"/>
    <sdef n="pp"      c="Participle"/>
    <sdef n="ifi"     c="Pretério perfecto o indefinido"/>
    <sdef n="pii"     c="Pretério imperfecto de indicativo"/>
    <sdef n="fti"     c="Future indicative"/>
    <sdef n="cni"     c="Conditional"/>
    <sdef n="prs"     c="Present subjunctive"/>
    <sdef n="pis"     c="Pretério imperfecto de subjunctivo"/>
    <sdef n="imp"     c="Imperfect"/>
    <sdef n="pos"     c="Possessive"/>
    <sdef n="gen"     c="Genitive"/>
    <sdef n="nom"     c="Nominative"/>
    <sdef n="sp"      c="Singular / Plural"/>
    <sdef n="ref"     c="Reflexive"/>
    <sdef n="num"     c="Numeral / Number"/>
    <sdef n="ij"      c="Interjection"/>

    <sdef n="atp"      c="Attachable prefix"/>

    <sdef n="uns"      c="Unstressed prefix"/>

    <sdef n="sent"    c="End of sentence"/>
    <sdef n="cm"      c="Comma"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"    c="Left parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"    c="Right parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="lquest"  c="Left question-mark"/>
    <sdef n="web"/>
    <sdef n="subs"/>
    <sdef n="pprs"/>    
    <sdef n="guio"    c="Hyphen"/> 
    <sdef n="enc"/>
    <sdef n="vbdo"/>
    <sdef n="unc"/>
    <sdef n="sep"/>
    <sdef n="pron"/>
    <sdef n="apos"    c="Apostrophe"/>

    <sdef n="pref"    c="Prefix"/>

    <sdef n="loc"     c="Location"/>
    <sdef n="per"     c="Person"/>
    <sdef n="org"     c="Organisation"/>
  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="guionet">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>-</l>
          <r>-<s n="guio"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="coma">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>,</l>
          <r>,<s n="cm"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="cometa">
      <e>
         <re>[’'‘]</re>
         <p>
           <l/>
           <r><s n="apos"/></r>
         </p>
      </e>
    </pardef> 

    <pardef n="years">
      <e>
        <re>[0-9][0-9]([0-9][0-9])?s</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ordinals">
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?de</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?ste</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
  
    <pardef n="separa">
    <e>
        <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="sent"/></r>
        </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
     <pardef n="separ">
    <e>
        <re>[¿¡]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="lquest"/></r>
        </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="paresq">
    <e>
        <re>[\(\[]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="lpar"/></r>
        </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pardret">
    <e>
        <re>[\)\]]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="rpar"/></r>
        </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <!-- Interjections -->

    <pardef n="hallo__ij">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="ij"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Numbers -->

    <pardef n="een__num">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="twee__num">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- Relative pronouns -->

    <pardef n="wat__rel">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="rel"/><s n="nn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="rel"/><s n="nn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

     <pardef n="wie__rel">
       <e>
         <p>
           <l/>
           <r><s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
         </p>
       </e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- Conjunctions -->

    <pardef n="dat__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
   

    <pardef n="en__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="want__cnjadv">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l/>
	  <r><s n="cnjadv"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Prepositions -->

    <pardef n="met__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="pr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Articles -->
    <pardef n="min__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/die__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sp"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="dat"><i>dat</i><par n="wie__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="wie"><i>wie</i><par n="wie__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="wat"><i>wat</i><par n="wie__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="wat"><i>wat</i><par n="wat__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="watter"><i>watter</i><par n="wat__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="die"><i>die</i><par n="/die__det"/></e>
    <e lm="dié"><i>dié</i><par n="/die__det"/></e>
    <e lm="min"><i>min</i><par n="min__det"/></e>
    <e lm="’n paar"><i>’n<b/>paar</i><par n="min__det"/></e>
    <e lm="as"><i>as</i><par n="met__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="jeens"><i>jeens</i><par n="met__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="sonder"><i>sonder</i><par n="met__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="in"><i>in</i><par n="met__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="óp"><i>op</i><par n="met__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="om te"><i>om<b/>te</i><par n="met__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ná"><i>ná</i><par n="met__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="voor"><i>voor</i><par n="met__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="volgens"><i>volgens</i><par n="met__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="terug"><i>terug</i><par n="met__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="namens"><i>namens</i><par n="met__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="anderkant"><i>anderkant</i><par n="met__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ooreenkoms met"><i>ooreenkoms<b/>met</i><par n="met__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="as gevolg van"><i>as<b/>gevolg<b/>van</i><par n="met__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="en"><i>en</i><par n="en__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="én" r="LR"><i>én</i><par n="en__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="nietemin"><i>nietemin</i><par n="en__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="of"><i>of</i><par n="en__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="óf" r="LR"><i>of</i><par n="en__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="maar"><i>maar</i><par n="en__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="egter"><i>egter</i><par n="en__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="asook"><i>asook</i><par n="en__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="as wat"><i>as<b/>wat</i><par n="en__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="sodra"><i>sodra</i><par n="want__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="vir"><i>vir</i><par n="want__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="so vroeg as"><i>so<b/>vroeg<b/>as</i><par n="want__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="siende dat"><i>siende<b/>dat</i><par n="want__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="gegee dat"><i>gegee<b/>dat</i><par n="want__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="byvoorbeeld"><i>byvoorbeeld</i><par n="want__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="tot"><i>tot</i><par n="want__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="indien"><i>indien</i><par n="want__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="wanneer"><i>wanneer</i><par n="want__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="omdat"><i>omdat</i><par n="want__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="sodat"><i>sodat</i><par n="want__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="ná" r="LR"><i>ná</i><par n="want__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="tensy"><i>tensy</i><par n="want__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="as"><i>as</i><par n="want__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="dat"><i>dat</i><par n="dat__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="een"><i>een</i><par n="een__num"/></e>
    <e lm="drie"><i>drie</i><par n="twee__num"/></e>
    <e lm="vier"><i>vier</i><par n="twee__num"/></e>
    <e lm="vyf"><i>vyf</i><par n="twee__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ses"><i>ses</i><par n="twee__num"/></e>
    <e lm="sewe"><i>sewe</i><par n="twee__num"/></e>
    <e lm="agt"><i>agt</i><par n="twee__num"/></e>
    <e lm="nege"><i>nege</i><par n="twee__num"/></e>
    <e lm="tien"><i>tien</i><par n="twee__num"/></e>
    <e lm="elf"><i>elf</i><par n="twee__num"/></e>
    <e lm="twaalf"><i>twaalf</i><par n="twee__num"/></e>
    <e lm="veertien"><i>veertien</i><par n="twee__num"/></e>
    <e lm="sestien"><i>sestien</i><par n="twee__num"/></e>
    <e lm="agtien"><i>agtien</i><par n="twee__num"/></e>
    <e lm="twintig"><i>twintig</i><par n="twee__num"/></e>
    <e lm="’n miljoen"><i>’n<b/>miljoen</i><par n="twee__num"/></e>
    <e lm="hallo"><i>hallo</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="ag nee"><i>ag<b/>nee</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="welkom by"><i>welkom<b/>by</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
    <e>
      <par n="separa"/> <!-- Separators -->
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="years"/> <!-- Numbers -->
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="ordinals"/> <!-- Numbers -->
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="numeros"/> <!-- Numbers -->
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="coma"/> <!-- Comma -->
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="cometa"/> <!-- Apostrophe -->
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="paresq"/> <!-- Left parenthensis -->
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="pardret"/> <!-- Right parenthesis -->
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="guionet"/> <!-- Hyphen -->
    </e>
